Mississippi, session 2026, SB2521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Each local public school district shall integrate for elementary school students a minimum of twenty (20) minutes of physical activity per full school day. (2)  As used in this section, physical activity: (a)  Must include unstructured play outside, unless weather conditions negatively impact reasonable execution of physical activity outside.  In such event, indoor spaces shall be made available for physical activity, unless it is immediately impracticable to do so. (b)  Does not include: (i)  Time during which a student is permitted to use an electronic device; (ii)  Time spent by a student in a physical education class; or (iii)  Walking to and from class. (3)  A student shall not be withheld from participating in physical activity as a form of punishment unless such student is an immediate threat to themselves or others. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.